Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 3 Committees
10-3-317. Disclosure of school district information and records — Access to electronic databases of Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.

The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall provide the Bureau of Legislative Research with direct read-and-report-only access to the division's data warehouse concerning school districts and related records.

In providing the bureau with the direct read-and-report-only access required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the division shall take reasonable precautions, including electronic blocking or redacting, to prevent the disclosure of:

Personally identifiable information of a student unless the parent or guardian of a minor student or a student who is no longer a minor consents in writing to the disclosure of personally identifiable information about that student; or

Information that would cause the division to lose funding under the provisions of 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, as it existed on January 1, 2007.

The division shall make its staff reasonably accessible for consultation with bureau staff in developing and responding appropriately to bureau requests under this section.

The bureau staff shall inform the division of any warehouse data used in the preparation of reports and provide the division at least one (1) working day to review any student-related warehouse data used in preparation of reports prior to publicly releasing that student-related data without individually identifiable information.

The division shall provide other information and records requested by the bureau as soon as possible and in whatever reasonable form requested.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The reference to “§10-3-301 et seq.” in §10-3-203 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” in the section heading and (a)(1); substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section; and made a stylistic change.

As used in this section:

“Occupational authorization” means a license, government-required certificate, registration, permit, or other form of authorization required by law or rule that is required for an individual to engage in a particular occupation or profession; and

“Occupational entity” means an office, board, commission, department, council, bureau, or other agency of state government having authority to establish or issue an occupational authorization.

The Legislative Council shall:

Review each occupational authorization and each occupational entity on an annual rotating basis to determine if the existing occupational authorization or occupational entity, or both, is consistent with the intent described in subsection (b) of this section.

(a)The occupational authorizations and the occupational entities shall be divided into six (6) groups to be determined by the Legislative Council.

The Legislative Council shall review one (1) group each year.

However, an occupational authorization or occupational entity may be reviewed out of the rotating basis if a member of the General Assembly makes a formal request to the Legislative Council and the cochairs of the Legislative Council approve the request.

After all groups have been reviewed one (1) time, the Legislative Council shall continue to review the groups as described in this section;

Analyze whether consumers are sufficiently protected by competition, public knowledge of the reputations of occupational practitioners, private ratings and reviews, private certification, voluntary bonding, and voluntary insurance.

If the Legislative Council finds substantiated evidence showing that the competition and private actions described in subdivision (d)(1)(B)(i) of this section provide for insufficient protection from significant harm, the Legislative Council shall use the following guidelines in the Legislative Council's review:

The effects of the existing occupational authorization and any proposed occupational reform on opportunities for workers, consumer choices, consumer costs, general unemployment, market competition, government costs, and any other effects deemed relevant;

Whether the occupational authorization and any proposed occupational reform employ the least restrictive form of occupational authorization to protect consumers from significant and substantiated harm to public health and safety;

If and to what degree existing occupational regulation and any proposed occupational reform delegate administrative rules promulgation to an occupational entity concerning the establishment of the following:

The qualifications for the occupational authorization; and

Make recommendations to the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate regarding:

The repeal of an occupational authorization;

The conversion of an occupational authorization to a less restrictive occupational authorization;

The promulgation of revised rules reflecting the use of a less restrictive occupational authorization consistent with subsection (e) of this section;

The modification of qualifications for an occupational authorization;

The modification or redefinition of the scope of practice of an occupation or profession; or

Any other relevant legislative reforms deemed necessary.

File a report with the Governor and the Legislative Council.

The report shall include:

The name of the occupation, the type of regulation, and the scope of practice for each occupation that the occupational entity regulates;

The amount of any fee or penalty associated with each occupation;

The number of individuals regulated by the occupational entity, grouped by occupational authorization;

A statement describing in what respects, if any, each occupational authorization is required by state or federal law; and

Any other relevant information as determined by the Legislative Council;

Appear at a public hearing before the Legislative Council to discuss the report prepared by the occupational entity; and

Provide any assistance requested to the Legislative Council regarding the review of each occupational authorization.

This section does not apply to occupational authorizations or occupational entities that are not subject to the oversight or purview of the General Assembly through the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 600, § 1, provided: “Title. This act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Red Tape Reduction Sunrise and Sunset Act of 2019’”.

Acts 2019, No. 600, § 2, provided: “Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)Arkansas is taking a leading role in the nationwide pursuit of reforms to the system of occupational licensing;

“(2)Arkansas became one (1) of eleven (11) states chosen to participate in the Occupational Licensing Policy Learning Consortium, an initiative funded by a grant from the United States Department of Labor and supported in partnership with the National Conference of State Legislatures, the Council of State Governments, and the National Governors Association;

“(3)Governor Asa Hutchinson appointed seventeen (17) individuals to the Red Tape Reduction Working Group to review and address occupational licensing regulations that create unnecessary barriers to labor market entry; and

“(4)The Red Tape Reduction Working Group issued a final report to the Governor in the fall of 2018 with five (5) recommendations for substantive legislative reform, which are to:

“(A)Establish an expedited procedure for occupational entities to collectively submit administrative rules that are responsive to new legislation;

“(B)Extend Acts 2017, No. 781, to allow repeal of subsections of rules;

“(C)Establish provisions to allow certain agencies to consider occupational relevance with regard to criminal background issues;

“(D)Authorize occupational entities to identify types of individuals or entities that may be issued temporary or provisional licenses; and

“(E)Establish a systematic process for review of:

“(i)New occupational authorization and occupational entities; and

“(ii)Existing occupational authorization and occupational entities.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish a systematic process for review of:

New occupational authorization and occupational entities; and

“(2)Existing occupational authorization and occupational entities”.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 16, provided:

“Nothing in this act shall affect any statutorily created subcommittee of a joint interim committee.”

Cross References. Institute of Legislative Procedure, §10-2-123.

Special early retirement allowances, colleges to report, §24-7-101.

Effective Dates. Acts 1955, No. 105, § 26: Feb. 24, 1955. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the Sixtieth General Assembly is faced with the problem of appropriating funds for the operation of state government; and whereas, additional information is needed for a proper determination of the needs of the various agencies and departments of government; and whereas, it is believed that future sessions of the General Assembly should be advised of the method in which state funds are administered in order that the General Assembly might properly discharge its duty of appropriating state funds, and that such information can be furnished only by the immediate passage of this act, now, therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1963, No. 499, § 4: Mar. 20, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is charged with the duty by law of post auditing of all state agencies and departments; that the post auditing thereof is a proper and necessary function of the General Assembly in verifying that state funds are properly and legally expended; that the members of said committee will be appointed during the Regular Session of the General Assembly and must meet immediately upon adjournment of the General Assembly to properly discharge the duties authorized by law, and that the providing of an adequate per diem as an expense allowance for each day spent in attending meetings of said committee is essential to the proper and efficient functions of the committee, and that only by the immediate passage of this act may such committee properly function. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1965, No. 411, § 3: Mar. 20, 1965. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a majority of the members of the Legislative Council are selected by caucus of the members of the House of Representatives from each of the six congressional districts as established by Act 297 of 1951; that such manner of selection was designed to assure that the membership of the Legislative Council would be composed of a broad cross-section of the members of the House of Representatives from the various areas of the state and would represent the views of the members of the House of Representatives from the various sections of the state; that there is some uncertainty in the present law regarding whether or not the two members of each district selected by caucus must be from different counties of the district, and that this act will clarify the law in this respect; that the members of the Legislative Council will be selected sometime prior to the adjournment of the Sixty-Fifth General Assembly and that it is desirable that this act become effective immediately in order to clarify this situation prior to the selection of such members. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1967, No. 107, § 3: Feb. 20, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that under the laws of this state the members of the House and Senate from each of the six congressional districts established by Act 297 of 1951 are to caucus for the selection of members and alternate members of the Legislative Council and the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee; that the reapportionment of the seats of the House and Senate has resulted in a number of members of the House and Senate being elected from Representative or Senatorial districts that comprise counties in more than one congressional district; and, that immediate clarification of the method to be followed in the conduct of the respective caucuses for the selection of such members and alternates is essential in order that each of these two important joint ad interim committees of the General Assembly may be properly selected during the current Regular Session of the General Assembly as required by law. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1967, No. 147, § 3: became law without Governor's signature, Feb. 24, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the membership of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is not large enough to permit an equitable distribution of its members among the various sections of the state, and that an equitable distribution of the members thereof is necessary in order that the various sections of the state and the various interests in each section can be properly represented, and that this act will correct this situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1967, No. 353, § 2: Mar. 14, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tem of the Senate are not now members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, and by virtue of the responsible positions they hold, it is essential that the Speaker of the House and the President Pro Tem of the Senate be added to the membership of said committee and that this act will correct this situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 662, § 3: Apr. 10, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee was directed by Act 105 of 1955 to provide for the auditing of each department, institution, board, commission, office, and agency of the state government of Arkansas, and that by subsequent legislation the Division of Local Audits was transferred to the Division of Legislative Audit and operates under the auditing jurisdiction of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee; that many audits of state agencies, cities, counties, and school districts reflect discrepancies in the handling or administering of public funds or the expenditure thereof, and other irregularities which cannot be fully determined by the Legislative Auditor or members of his staff; that in order to enable the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee to make a full determination of all facts and circumstances necessary in connection with an audit it is essential that the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee be authorized to subpoena individuals, books, records, and documents that may be necessary to make a full determination of all facts essential to the completion of any such investigation; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to authorize the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee to issue subpoenas whenever the committee determines that the same is necessary for a proper discharge of its duties in keeping the General Assembly informed with respect to the handling and administration of public funds. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 929, § 3: Apr. 8, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventieth General Assembly that the Arkansas Legislative Council and the Arkansas Joint Auditing Committee have many matters of pressing importance to be considered, that said committees will be selected during the Regular Session of the General Assembly and will meet upon adjournment of the General Assembly and that establishment of an adequate and proper per diem, expense allowance and mileage reimbursement for attending meetings of such committees is necessary for the proper discharge of the duties of said committees. Now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 371, § 5: Mar. 7, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee should be authorized to meet during the General Assembly and that the transacting of business by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee will serve to the benefit of the people of the State of Arkansas and that this act will provide for this action. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 988, §§ 5, 7: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the workload of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and its staff has increased substantially in recent years; that the committee is called upon more and more to conduct federally mandated audits of state agencies and the various subdivisions of the state, which federal audits must be conducted and reported in a different manner and format than regular audits conducted by the committee and its staff; that it is essential to the effective and efficient administration of the primary responsibilities of the committee that a procedure be established whereby the committee can properly determine whether time and staff limitations will permit the committee to make particular federal audits which are requested and that this act is designed to establish such procedure; and that this procedure should be initiated beginning with the 1981-82 fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1987, No. 84, § 4: Feb. 25, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that the House of Representatives and Senate select their members to the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee from the old six congressional districts; that the selection from the present four congressional districts would be more equitable; that the selection is to be made prior to adjournment of this legislative session; and therefore, this act must go into effect as soon as possible to grant the House and Senate the authority to change the method of selection of its members to the Legislative Council and the Joint Auditing Committee. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 542, § 7: Mar. 16, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this act affects the method of selection of members of the House of Representatives to the Legislative Council, Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and the Joint Budget Committee; and that this act is immediately necessary to provide for the proper selection of such members during the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 24: Oct. 23, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the current law relating to the operation of interim committees of the General Assembly unduly restricts the interim work of the General Assembly by authorizing committees to meet only as joint committees of the House of Representatives and the Senate; that in order to enable the Senate and House of Representatives to efficiently and effectively perform their interim duties, it is necessary that the interim committees of each house be authorized to meet either jointly or separately and that this act should be given effect immediately to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 147, § 14: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 466, § 9: Feb. 28, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee should now have co-chairpersons and co-vice chairpersons instead of a chairperson and vice-chairperson; that this act so provides; that these officers will be selected by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee as soon as it organizes after the adjournment of this regular session; and that unless this act goes into effect immediately, the Committee will not be able to select its co-chairpersons until perhaps months after its initial meeting. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 12: Apr. 13, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and the Division of Legislative Audit provide essential auditing and investigative services to the General Assembly and the State of Arkansas; that to avoid confusion, the General Assembly finds it is necessary to combine the Arkansas Code provisions concerning the Division of Legislative Audit and the local audit section of the division in one Arkansas Code chapter; that to avoid certain undue hardships on public entities of the state, it is also necessary for the General Assembly to provide a basis of financial statement presentation for certain public entities; that the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants' Statement on Auditing Standards Number 99 regarding the detection of fraud requires auditors to document unsubstantiated allegations of fraud in their working papers; and that this act is immediately necessary because the General Assembly finds that the public disclosure of such unsubstantiated allegations do not serve a public purpose and may cause irreparable harm to innocent individuals and public employees. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

History.

Acts 2007, No. 624, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2209.

10-3-318. Review of occupational authorizations and occupational entities — Findings and intent — Definitions.

The General Assembly finds and determines that it is in the best interest of this state to conduct a periodic comprehensive review of all occupational authorizations and the occupational entities that issue them.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to determine and implement the least restrictive form of occupational authorization to protect consumers from significant and substantiated harms to public health and safety.

The scope of practice for the occupation or profession; or

Whether a significant and substantiated exposure to antitrust litigation under any existing occupational regulation and under any proposed occupational reform exists; and

However, the Legislative Council is not required to recommend any legislative reform for any particular occupational authorization or occupational entity.

The Legislative Council may:

Establish or utilize one (1) or more subcommittees to assist in its duties under this section;

Assign information filed with the Legislative Council under this section to one (1) or more subcommittees of the Legislative Council, including without limitation a subcommittee created under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section; and

Delegate its duties under this section to one (1) or more subcommittees of the Legislative Council, subject to final review and approval of the Legislative Council.

If the Legislative Council determines that it is necessary, the Legislative Council may contract with consultants to assist in the duties assigned under this section or request the staff of Arkansas Legislative Audit to assist in the duties assigned under this section.

(1)The Legislative Council shall analyze whether consumers can be sufficiently protected by competition, the reputations of occupational practitioners, private ratings and reviews, private certification, voluntary bonding, and voluntary insurance.

If the Legislative Council finds substantiated evidence of significant harm arising from:

(i)Contractual disputes, including pricing disputes, the Legislative Council may recommend enacting legislation allowing lawsuits in small claims court or district court to remedy a specific consumer harm.

A cause of action described in subdivision (e)(2)(A)(i) of this section may provide for reimbursement of attorney's fees or court costs if a consumer claim is successful;

Fraud, the Legislative Council may recommend legislation strengthening powers under the deceptive trade practices laws or requiring disclosures to reduce misleading attributes of the specific good or service;

General health and safety, the Legislative Council may recommend legislation enacting a law or rule that regulates the related process or requires a business license;

Unclean facilities, the Legislative Council may recommend legislation requiring periodic facility inspections;

Failure of an occupational licensee to complete a contract fully or comply with standards, the Legislative Council may recommend legislation requiring the occupational licensee to be bonded;

Lack of protection for a person who is not a party to a contract between an occupational licensee and a consumer, the Legislative Council may recommend legislation requiring the occupational licensee to have insurance;

Transactions with transient, out-of-state, or fly-by-night occupational licensees, the Legislative Council may recommend legislation requiring the occupational licensee to register the business with the Secretary of State;

Shortfalls or lack of knowledge about the good or service among consumers relative to the occupational practitioner's knowledge, the Legislative Council may recommend legislation enacting government-required certification or other occupational authorization;

Systematic information shortfall in which a reasonable consumer of a service is permanently unable to distinguish between the quality of occupational licensees and an absence of guidance to the consumers, the Legislative Council may recommend legislation enacting or maintaining an occupational authorization; or

Multiple areas listed in subdivisions (e)(2)(A)-(I) of this section, the Legislative Council may recommend legislation with a combination of occupational authorization, including regulation with a private remedy, third-party or consumer-created ratings and reviews, or private certification.

Under a timeline as determined by the Legislative Council, an occupational entity shall:

History.

Acts 2019, No. 600, § 3.

Subchapter 4

— Legislative Joint Auditing Committee

10-3-401. Creation.

There is established a committee of the General Assembly to be known as the “Legislative Joint Auditing Committee”. It is the intention of the General Assembly that this shall be a joint interim committee of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 105, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-701.